Utah statutes.
39-6-24.   Person charged -- Limits on evidence obtained from other persons.
(1)  A person subject to this chapter may not:
(a)  compel any person to incriminate himself or to answer any question, the
answer to which may tend to incriminate him;
(b)  interrogate, or request any statement from an accused or a person
suspected of an offense, without first informing him of the nature of the
accusation and advising him that he is not required to make any statement
regarding the offense of which he is accused or suspected, and that any
statement made by him may be used as evidence against him in a trial by
military court; and
(c)  compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any
military court, if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue
before the court and may tend to degrade him.
(2)  A statement obtained from any person in violation of this section, or
through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement may
not be received in evidence against him in a trial by a military court.
